Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Nonhazardous Solid Waste Planning Act of 1991

§ 17-17-201.
Short title.

Sections 17-17-201 through 17-17-235 shall be known and may be cited as the “Nonhazardous Solid Waste Planning Act of 1991.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-203.
Legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds that:

Over one million five hundred thousand (1,500,000) tons of municipal solid waste are generated in Mississippi each year of which an estimated fifty thousand (50,000) tons is not even collected for disposal;

On the average, each Mississippian currently discards approximately four (4) pounds of municipal solid waste each day;

There are currently ninety-eight (98) commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facilities in this state;

Most of the permitted sanitary landfill capacity will be used within the next ten (10) years;

Monthly household collection fees have increased approximately fifteen percent (15%) in the last year. The costs of nonhazardous solid waste management will increase significantly due to decreased landfill capacity and more stringent federal requirements for nonhazardous solid waste management facilities. More stringent federal requirements may force an estimated eighty percent (80%) of the existing permitted facilities to close;

Mississippians are spending approximate Fifty-five Million Dollars ($55,000,000.00) on nonhazardous solid waste management;

Inefficient and improper methods of managing nonhazardous solid waste create hazards to the public health, cause pollution of air and water resources, constitute a waste of natural resources, have an adverse effect on land values and create public nuisances;

Problems of nonhazardous solid waste management have become a matter statewide in scope and necessitate state action to assist local governments in identifying, financing, and improving methods and processes for more efficient management and collection of nonhazardous solid waste; and

The economic and population growth of our state and improvements in the standard of living enjoyed by our population have resulted in a rising tide of unwanted and discarded materials.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of Sections 17-17-201 through 17-17-235 shall:

In order to protect the public health, safety and well-being of its citizens and to protect and enhance the quality of its environment, institute and maintain a comprehensive program for state and local solid waste management planning which will assure that solid waste management facilities meet the needs of the state and its localities, whether publicly or privately operated, are planned, developed and constructed in a timely manner;

Reaffirm the state’s policy of minimizing the amount of nonhazardous solid waste being generated and managed at facilities in the state and the commitment to reach the state’s goal of reducing and minimizing waste generated in Mississippi by a minimum of twenty-five percent (25%) by January 1, 1996;

Provide that a county shall have the power and its duty shall be to ensure the availability of adequate permitted management capacity for the nonhazardous solid waste which is generated within its boundaries;

Establish that a municipality shall have the power and its duty shall be to assure the proper and adequate collection, transportation and storage of the nonhazardous solid waste generated or present within the area served by such municipality and in cooperation with the county, to assure adequate capacity for the processing, recycling and disposal of nonhazardous solid waste generated or present within the area served by such municipality; and

Reaffirm that the state shall have the power and its duty shall be to regulate the management of nonhazardous solid waste and ensure that all nonhazardous solid waste management planning results in strategies for environmentally sound nonhazardous solid waste management systems.

It is further the intent of the Legislature that, in light of the impending issuance of the Final Subtitle D regulations, the existing laws and regulations with regard to permitted sanitary landfills should be consistently enforced.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 587, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 17-17-205.
Definitions.

“Closure” means the ceasing operation of a sanitary landfill and securing the landfill so that it does not pose a significant threat to public health or the environment and includes long-term monitoring and maintenance of the landfill.

“Label” means a molded, imprinted or raised symbol on or near the bottom of a plastic container or bottle.

“Local government” means a county or a municipality within the State of Mississippi.

“Municipal solid waste” means any nonhazardous solid waste resulting from the operation of residential, commercial, governmental, industrial or institutional establishments except oil field exploration and production wastes and sewage sludge.

“Owner” or “operator” means any person, corporation, county, municipality or group of counties or municipalities acting jointly operating a sanitary landfill or having any interest in the land whereon a sanitary landfill is or has been located.

“Plastic” means any material made of polymeric organic compounds and additives that can be shaped by flow.

“Plastic bottle” means a plastic container intended for single use that:

Has a neck smaller than the body of the container;

Is designed for a screw-top, snap cap or other closure; and

Has a capacity of not less than sixteen (16) fluid ounces or more than five (5) gallons.

“Rigid plastic container” means any formed or molded container intended for single use, composed predominately of plastic resin, that has a relatively inflexible finite shape or form with a capacity of not less than eight (8) ounces or more than five (5) gallons. This term does not include a plastic bottle.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-207.
Molding or imprinting of plastic bottles or containers with symbols indicating plastic resin used in producing bottle or container; specification of symbols; maintenance and distribution of list of symbols.

This section and any rules or regulations adopted hereunder shall be interpreted to conform with nationwide plastics industry standards.

A person may not manufacture or distribute a plastic bottle or rigid plastic container unless the appropriate symbol indicating the plastic resin used to produce the bottle or container is molded into or imprinted on the bottom or near the bottom of the bottle or container. A plastic bottle or rigid container with a base cup or other component of a material different from the basic material used in making the bottle or container shall bear the symbol indicating its basic material.

The symbols used under this section must consist of a number placed within a triangle of arrows and of letters placed below the triangle of arrows. The triangle must be equilateral, formed by three (3) arrows with the apex of each point of the triangle at the midpoint of each arrow, rounded with a short radius. The arrowhead of each arrow must be at the midpoint of each side of the triangle with a short gap separating the arrowhead from the base of the adjacent arrow. The triangle formed by the arrows must depict a clockwise path around the number.

The numbers, letters of the symbols and the plastic resins represented by the symbols are:

1 and PETE, representing polyethylene terephthalate;

2 and HDPE, representing high density polyethylene;

3 and V, representing vinyl;

4 and LDPE, representing low density polyethylene;

5 and PP, representing polypropylene;

6 and PS, representing polystyrene;

7 and OTHER, representing all other resins, including layered plastics of a combination of materials.

The department shall:

Maintain a list of the symbols; and

Provide a copy of that list to any person on request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-209.
Imposition of bans, deposits or taxes on plastic bottles and containers by municipalities, etc.

Sections 17-17-201 through 17-17-235 shall not be construed to allow any municipality, county or other political subdivision to impose a ban, deposit or tax on plastic containers and bottles.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-211.
Penalties for violations of § 17-17-207; injunctions.

After being notified by the department that a plastic container does not comply with the provisions of Section 17-17-207, a person who violates Section 17-17-207, is subject to a civil penalty of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each day of violation and may be enjoined from such violations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-213.
Rules and regulations.

Not later than October 1, 1991, the Commission on Environmental Quality shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing standards for the production of compost. The commission may modify, repeal, make exceptions to and grant exceptions and variances from such rules and regulations. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Requirements necessary to produce hygienically safe compost products for varying applications.

A classification scheme for compost based on the types of waste composted, including at least one (1) type containing only yard trash; the maturity of the compost, including at least three (3) degrees of decomposition for fresh, semimature and mature; and the levels of organic and inorganic constituents in the compost. This scheme shall address:

Methods for measurement of the compost maturity;

Particle sizes;

Moisture content; and

Average levels of organic and inorganic constituents, including heavy metals, for such classes of compost as the Commission on Environmental Quality establishes, and the analytical methods to determine those levels.

Not later than January 1, 1992, the Commission on Environmental Quality shall promulgate rules and regulations prescribing the allowable uses and application rates of compost based, at a minimum, on the following criteria:

The total quantity of organic and inorganic constituents, including heavy metals, allowed to be applied through the addition of compost to the soil per acre per year.

The allowable uses of compost based on maturity and type of compost.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-215.
Disposition of compost not conforming to criteria prescribed by Commission.

If compost is produced which does not meet the criteria prescribed by the Commission on Environmental Quality for agricultural and other use, the compost must be reprocessed or disposed of in a manner approved by the Commission on Environmental Quality, unless a different application is specifically authorized by the Commission on Environmental Quality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-217.
Environmental Protection Trust Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund designated as the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be administered by the executive director of the department.

The Commission on Environmental Quality shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the fund and for a system of priorities for any related projects or programs eligible for funding from the fund.

The commission may utilize any funds in the Environmental Protection Fund for defraying the costs of the Department of Environmental Quality for administering the nonhazardous waste program, including the development of the state nonhazardous solid waste management plan as authorized by law. The commission may also use the fund to accomplish the purposes of the multimedia pollution prevention program created under Section 49-31-11.

Expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the executive director of the department.

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal in the fund shall be credited by the department to the fund.

The fund may receive monies from any available public or private source, including, but not limited to, collection of fees, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations, petroleum violation escrow funds or refunds, and appropriated funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 10; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 395, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 483, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 17-17-219.
Filing by owners or operators of commercial facilities managing municipal solid wastes of annual statements of waste received and managed; per-ton fees imposed on management of waste; daily record of waste delivered to facilities; annual aggregate report of wastes received at facilities.

Before July 15 of each year the operator of a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility managing municipal solid waste shall file with the State Tax Commission and the department a statement, verified by oath, showing the total amounts of nonhazardous solid waste managed at the facility during the preceding calendar year, and shall at the same time pay to the State Tax Commission One Dollar ($1.00) per ton of municipal solid waste generated and managed in the state by landfilling or incineration, including waste-to-energy management. The fee shall not be levied upon rubbish which is collected and disposed separately from residential or household waste and which is not managed for compensation. For ash and sludges which contain a significant amount of water, the fee may be calculated on a dry ton basis.

Before July 15 of each year, the operator of a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility managing municipal solid waste shall file with the State Tax Commission and the department a statement, verified by oath, showing the total amounts of solid waste received from out of state and managed at the facility during the preceding calendar year.

Before July 15 of each year, the operator of a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility managing municipal solid waste located in this state shall pay to the State Tax Commission an amount equal to the greater of the per-ton fee imposed on the management of out-of-state nonhazardous solid waste by the state from which the nonhazardous solid waste originated or the per-ton fee, if any, imposed on the management of nonhazardous solid waste by this state. The sum shall be based on the total amounts of nonhazardous solid waste managed at the facility during the preceding calendar year and shall be paid to the State Tax Commission at the same time that reports are filed under subsection (2)(a) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, all monies received by the State Tax Commission as provided in this chapter shall be allocated as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) shall be remitted to the Mississippi Nonhazardous Solid Waste Corrective Action Trust Fund; and

Fifty percent (50%) shall be remitted to the Environmental Protection Trust Fund.

All administrative provisions of the Mississippi Sales Tax Law, including those which fix damages, penalties and interest for nonpayment of taxes and for noncompliance with the provisions of such chapter, and all other duties and requirements imposed upon taxpayers, shall apply to all persons liable for fees under the provisions of this chapter, and the Tax Commissioner shall exercise all the power and authority and perform all the duties with respect to taxpayers under this chapter as are provided in the Mississippi Sales Tax Law except where there is a conflict, then the provisions of this chapter shall control.

The operator of a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility managing municipal solid waste shall keep an accurate written daily record of deliveries of solid waste to the facility as required by the department, including, but not limited to, the name of the hauler, the source of the waste, the types of waste received and the weight of solid waste measured in tons received at the facility. A copy of these records shall be maintained at the site by the operator and shall be made available to the department for inspection upon request.

The operator shall file with the department annually, on such forms as the department may prescribe, a report providing aggregate information on the types, amounts and sources of waste received at the facility during the preceding calendar year. The State Tax Commission and the department shall share information provided under this section.

When the unobligated balance in the Mississippi Nonhazardous Solid Waste Corrective Action Trust Fund reaches or exceeds Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00), the department shall pay funds allocated under Section 17-17-219(3)(a) to the Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund created under Section 17-17-65 on the next scheduled payment date. After July 1, 2000, the department may transfer any unobligated balance in the Mississippi Nonhazardous Solid Waste Corrective Action Trust Fund exceeding Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00) to the Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund. When the unobligated balance is reduced below Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00), the department shall reduce payments to the Local Governments Solid Waste Assistance Fund to two-thirds (2/3) of the funds allocated under Section 17-17-219(3)(a) and shall pay the remaining one-third (1/3) of the funds allocated under Section 17-17-219(3)(a) to the Mississippi Nonhazardous Solid Waste Corrective Action Trust Fund until the time as that fund balance reaches or exceeds Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 11; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 596, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 458, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 395, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 483, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 17-17-221.
Development and administration of state nonhazardous solid waste management plan; goals and contents; updating of plan.

The department may develop a state nonhazardous solid waste management plan. The state nonhazardous solid waste management plan shall utilize the information, conclusions and recommendations of the approved local nonhazardous solid waste management plans.

If developed, the state nonhazardous solid waste management plan shall include, at a minimum, the following:

An identification and analysis of the amounts and types of municipal solid waste from all sources which is generated in the state or transported into the state for management;

An inventory and evaluation of all existing and planned municipal solid waste management facilities, including their permit status and the remaining capacity of existing facilities;

An inventory of open and unauthorized dumps and a strategy for closing such sites;

A strategy for achieving the twenty-five percent (25%) waste reduction goal through source reduction, recycling or other waste reduction technologies;

A projection, using acceptable averaging methods, of municipal solid waste generated annually by each county over the next twenty (20) years and an evaluation of the adequacy of existing capacity to handle the anticipated projected volume and composition of waste;

Information, conclusions and recommendations in local nonhazardous solid waste management plans for future facilities;

A description of public education and information programs on the management of municipal solid waste; and

A determination of the adequacy of programs for the management of yard wastes, tires, lead acid batteries, household hazardous wastes and white goods.

The department shall update the plan as needed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 12; Laws, 1998, ch. 498, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 17-17-223.
Development of planning guidance and forms for local nonhazardous solid waste management plans.

Not later than sixty (60) days after publication of the Final Subtitle D regulations in the Federal Register, but in no case later than January 1, 1992, the department shall develop planning guidance and forms for local nonhazardous solid waste management plans. The department shall make such guidance and forms available to local governments at no cost.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).

§ 17-17-225.
Establishment of criteria for evaluation of local nonhazardous solid waste management plans.

Before July 1, 1992, the commission shall establish criteria for the evaluation of local nonhazardous solid waste management plans. These criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The unit of local government’s demonstration of the understanding of its nonhazardous solid waste management system, including the sources, composition and quantities of nonhazardous solid waste generated within the planning area and transported into the planning area for management, and the existing and planned nonhazardous solid waste management capacity, including remaining available capacity;

The adequacy of the local strategy for achieving the twenty-five percent (25%) waste minimization goal;

The reasonableness of the twenty-year projections of nonhazardous solid waste generated within the planning area; and

The adequacy of plans and implementation schedules for providing needed nonhazardous solid waste management capacity for the twenty-year period.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494 § 14; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 17-17-227.
County adoption of local nonhazardous solid waste management plan; contents; municipality participation; interlocal agreements; notice, ratification, review and implementation; alternative procedure for modifications; department to maintain copies; noncompliance with publication requirements.

Each county, in cooperation with municipalities within the county, shall prepare, adopt and submit to the commission for review and approval a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan for the county. Each local nonhazardous solid waste management plan shall include, at a minimum, the following:

An inventory of the sources, composition and quantities by weight or volume of municipal solid waste annually generated within the county, and the source, composition and quantity by weight or volume of municipal solid waste currently transported into the county for management;

An inventory of all existing facilities where municipal solid waste is currently being managed, including the environmental suitability and operational history of each facility, and the remaining available permitted capacity for each facility;

An inventory of existing solid waste collection systems and transfer stations within the county. The inventory shall identify the entities engaging in municipal solid waste collection within the county;

A strategy for achieving a twenty-five percent (25%) waste reduction goal through source reduction, recycling or other waste reduction technologies;

A projection, using acceptable averaging methods, of municipal solid waste generated within the boundaries of the county over the next twenty (20) years;

An identification of the additional municipal solid waste management facilities, including an evaluation of alternative management technologies, and the amount of additional capacity needed to manage the quantities projected in paragraph (e);

An estimation of development, construction, operational, closure and post-closure costs, including a proposed method for financing those costs;

A plan for meeting any projected capacity shortfall, including a schedule and methodology for attaining the required capacity;

A determination of need by the county, municipality, authority or district that is submitting the plan, for any new or expanded facilities. A determination of need shall include, at a minimum, the following:

Verification that the proposed facility meets needs identified in the approved local nonhazardous solid waste management plan which shall take into account the quantities of municipal solid waste generated and the design capacities of existing facilities;

Certification that the proposed facility complies with local land use and zoning requirements, if any;

Demonstration, to the extent possible, that operation of the proposed facility will not negatively impact the waste reduction strategy of the county, municipality, authority or district that is submitting the plan;

Certification that the proposed service area of the proposed facility is consistent with the local nonhazardous solid waste management plan; and

A description of the extent to which the proposed facility is needed to replace other facilities; and

Any other information the commission may require.

Each local nonhazardous solid waste management plan may include:

The preferred site or alternative sites for the construction of any additional municipal solid waste management facilities needed to properly manage the quantities of municipal solid waste projected for the service areas covered by the plan, including the factors which provided the basis for identifying the preferred or alternative sites; and

The method of implementation of the plan with regard to the person who will apply for and acquire the permit for any planned additional facilities and the person who will own or operate any of the facilities.

Each municipality shall cooperate with the county in planning for the management of municipal solid waste generated within its boundaries or the area served by that municipality. The governing authority of any municipality which does not desire to be included in the local nonhazardous solid waste management plan shall adopt a resolution stating its intent not to be included in the county plan. The resolution shall be provided to the board of supervisors and the commission. Any municipality resolving not to be included in a county waste plan shall prepare a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan in accordance with this section.

The board of supervisors of any county may enter into interlocal agreements with one or more counties as provided by law to form a regional solid waste management authority or other district to provide for the management of municipal solid waste for all participating counties. For purposes of Section 17-17-221 through Section 17-17-227, a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan prepared, adopted, submitted and implemented by the regional solid waste management authority or other district is sufficient to satisfy the planning requirements for the counties and municipalities within the boundaries of the authority or district.

Upon completion of its local nonhazardous solid waste management plan, the board of supervisors of the county shall publish in at least one (1) newspaper as defined in Section 13-3-31, having general circulation within the county a public notice that describes the plan, specifies the location where it is available for review, and establishes a period of thirty (30) days for comments concerning the plan and a mechanism for submitting those comments. The board of supervisors shall also notify the board of supervisors of adjacent counties of the plan and shall make it available for review by the board of supervisors of each adjacent county. During the comment period, the board of supervisors of the county shall conduct at least one (1) public hearing concerning the plan. The board of supervisors of the county shall publish twice in at least one (1) newspaper as defined in Section 13-3-31, having general circulation within the county, a notice conspicuously displayed containing the time and place of the hearing and the location where the plan is available for review.

After the public hearing, the board of supervisors of the county may modify the plan based upon the public’s comments. Within ninety (90) days after the public hearing, each board of supervisors shall approve a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan by resolution.

A regional solid waste management authority or other district shall declare the plan to be approved as the authority’s or district’s solid waste management plan upon written notification, including a copy of the resolution, that the board of supervisors of each county forming the authority or district has approved the plan.

Upon ratification of the plan, the governing body of the county, authority or district shall submit it to the commission for review and approval in accordance with Section 17-17-225. The commission shall, by order, approve or disapprove the plan within one hundred eighty (180) days after its submission. The commission shall include with an order disapproving a plan a statement outlining the deficiencies in the plan and directing the governing body of the county, authority or district to submit, within one hundred twenty (120) days after issuance of the order, a revised plan that remedies those deficiencies. If the governing body of the county, authority or district, by resolution, requests an extension of the time for submission of a revised plan, the commission may, for good cause shown, grant one (1) extension for a period of not more than sixty (60) additional days.

After approval of the plan or revised plan by the commission, the governing body of the county, authority or district shall implement the plan in compliance with the implementation schedule contained in the approved plan.

The governing body of the county, authority or district shall annually review implementation of the approved plan. The commission may require the governing body of each local government or authority to revise the local nonhazardous solid waste management plan as necessary, but not more than once every five (5) years.

If the commission finds that the governing body of a county, authority or district has failed to submit a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan, obtain approval of its local nonhazardous solid waste management plan or materially fails to implement its local nonhazardous solid waste management plan, the commission shall issue an order in accordance with Section 17-17-29, to the governing body of the county, authority or district.

The commission may, by regulation, adopt an alternative procedure to the procedure described in this section for the preparation, adoption, submission, review and approval of minor modifications of an approved local nonhazardous solid waste management plan. For purposes of this section, minor modifications may include administrative changes or the addition of any noncommercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility.

The executive director of the department shall maintain a copy of all local nonhazardous solid waste management plans that the commission has approved and any orders issued by the commission.

If a public notice required in subsection (5) was published in a newspaper as defined in Section 13-3-31, having general circulation within the county but was not published in a daily newspaper of general circulation as required by subsection (5) before April 20, 1993, the commission shall not disapprove the plan for failure to publish the notice in a daily newspaper. Any plan disapproved for that reason by the commission shall be deemed approved after remedying any other deficiencies in the plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 15; Laws, 1993, ch. 600, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 498, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 587, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 17-17-229.
Facility permits for nonhazardous solid waste management; application requirements and criteria.

After approval of a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan by the commission, neither the department, the permit board nor any other agency of the State of Mississippi shall issue any permit, grant or loan for any nonhazardous solid waste management facility in a county, municipality region, or district which is not consistent with the approved local nonhazardous solid waste management plan.

The commission shall adopt criteria to be considered in location and permitting of nonhazardous solid waste management facilities. The criteria shall be developed through public participation, shall be enforced by the permit board and shall include, in addition to all applicable state and federal rules and regulations, consideration of:

Hydrological and geological factors, such as floodplains, depth to water table, soil composition, and permeability, cavernous bedrock, seismic activity, and slope;

Natural resources factors, such as wetlands, endangered species habitats, proximity to parks, forests, wilderness areas and historical sites, and air quality;

Land use factors, such as local land use, whether residential, industrial, commercial, recreational, agricultural, proximity to public water supplies, and proximity to incompatible structures such as schools, churches and airports;

Transportation factors, such as proximity to waste generators and to population, route safety and method of transportation; and

Aesthetic factors, such as the visibility, appearance and noise level of the facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 16; Laws, 1998, ch. 498, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 587, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 17-17-231.
Adoption of rules and regulations governing municipal sanitary landfills.

The Commission on Environmental Quality may adopt rules and regulations governing municipal solid waste landfills that accept household wastes, but any rules and regulations for such landfills shall, except for the adoption of criteria and standards to be considered in the location of such facilities, be no more stringent or extensive in scope, coverage and effect than Subtitle D regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

If Subtitle D regulations do not provide a standard, criteria or guidance addressing matters relating to landfills, the commission may promulgate rules and regulations to address these matters in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law when the commission determines that such rules and regulation are necessary to protect human health, welfare or the environment.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commission by order or the Permit Board in the issuance or modification of a permit from placing additional requirements on a landfill on a case by case basis in order to prevent, abate, control or correct groundwater contamination, public endangerment or as otherwise determined necessary to protect human health, welfare or the environment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 18; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 20; Laws, 1993, ch. 484, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1993).

§ 17-17-233.
Establishment, collection and disposition of fees, surcharges, etc., to produce resources for closure of landfills and post-closure monitoring and remediation.

From and after October 9, 1993, the owner of a sanitary landfill shall establish a fee, or a surcharge on existing fees or other appropriate revenue-producing mechanism, to ensure the availability of financial resources for the proper closure of the sanitary landfill and post-closure monitoring and remediation. However, the disposal of solid waste by persons on their own property, as described in Section 17-17-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is exempt from this section.

The revenue-producing mechanism must produce revenue at a rate sufficient to generate funds to meet state and federal landfill closure and post-closure requirements.

The revenue shall be deposited in an interest-bearing escrow account to be held and administered by the owner. The owner shall file with the department an annual audit of the account. The audit shall be conducted by a certified public accountant and shall be filed no later than December 31 of each year. Failure to collect or report such revenue is a noncriminal violation, punishable by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each offense. The owner may make expenditures from the account and its accumulated interest only for the purpose of landfill closure and post-closure requirements. If such expenditures do not deplete the fund to the detriment of eventual closure and post-closure requirements, any monies remaining in the account after paying for proper and complete closure and all post-closure requirements, as determined by the commission, shall be returned to the owner.

The revenue generated under this section and any accumulated interest thereon may be applied to the repayment of any loan or the payment of, or pledged as security for, the payment of revenue bonds issued in whole or in part for the purpose of complying with state and federal landfill closure and post-closure requirements. Such application or pledge may be made directly in the proceedings authorizing such bonds or in an agreement with an insurer of bonds to assure such insurer of additional security therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 19; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 17-17-235.
Proof of financial responsibility by owner or operator of sanitary landfill in lieu of requirements of § 17-17-233.

An owner or operator of a sanitary landfill may establish proof of financial responsibility with the commission in lieu of the requirements of Section 17-17-233. Such proof may include surety bonds, certificates of deposit, securities, letter of credit, or other methods, as approved by the commission, showing that the owner or operator has sufficient financial resources to cover, at a minimum, the costs of complying with any closure and post-closure requirements. The owner or operator shall estimate such costs to the satisfaction of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 494, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991).